apertium-eu-es/apertium-eu-es.eu.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="iso-8859-1"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>·ÀÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÙÚÛÜàáâäçèéêëìíîïñòóôöùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz</alphabet>

 <sdefs>
   <sdef n="n"/>
   <sdef n="adj"/>
   <sdef n="pos"/>
   <sdef n="det"/>
   <sdef n="art"/>
   <sdef n="def"/>
   <sdef n="sg"/>
   <sdef n="pl"/>   
   <sdef n="num"/> 
   <sdef n="sent"/>
   <sdef n="cm"/>
   <sdef n="lpar"/>
   <sdef n="rpar"/>
   <sdef n="lquest"/>
   <sdef n="guio"/>
</sdefs>

  <pardefs>
 <pardef n="numeros">
    
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="separa">
    
      <e>
        <re>[.\?;:!]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="sent"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="coma">
    
      <e>
        <re>,</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="cm"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="separ">
    
      <e>
        <re>[¿¡]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="lquest"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="paresq">
    
      <e>
        <re>[\(\[]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="lpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pardret">
    
      <e>
        <re>[\)\]]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="rpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="liburu__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><j/>a<s n="det"/><s n="art"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ak</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><j/>a<s n="det"/><s n="art"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="nire__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><j/>a<s n="det"/><s n="art"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ak</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><j/>a<s n="det"/><s n="art"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
     <pardef n="gorri__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><j/>a<s n="det"/><s n="art"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ak</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><j/>a<s n="det"/><s n="art"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
 </pardefs>

  <section id="main" type="standard">
      
      <e lm="liburu">
        <i>liburu</i>
        <par n="liburu__n"/>
      </e> 
       <e lm="etxe">
        <i>etxe</i>
        <par n="liburu__n"/>
      </e> 
      <e lm="kantari">
        <i>kantari</i>
        <par n="liburu__n"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="nire">
        <i>nire</i>
        <par n="nire__det"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="gorri">
        <i>gorri</i>
        <par n="gorri__adj"/>
      </e>
</section>

  <section id="final" type="inconditional">
     
      
      <e>
        <par n="separa"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <par n="numeros"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <par n="coma"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <par n="paresq"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <par n="pardret"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <par n="separ"/>
      </e>
     
  </section>


</dictionary>
